Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3A Historical Records Advisory Board

45-13-55 and 45-13-56.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-2/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Article 3A of Chapter 13 of Title 45, consisting of Code Sections 45-13-55 and 45-13-56, as present Part 1B of Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 20, consisting of Code Sections 20-3-45 and 20-3-45.1, respectively.